Maine, session 132, LD1506.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §655, sub-§1, ¶P, as amended by PL 2007, c. 627, §23, is further
amended to read:
P. All items of individually owned personal property with a just value of less than
$1,000 $5,000, except:
(1) Items used for industrial or commercial purposes; and
(2) Vehicles as defined in section 1481 that are not subject to an excise tax;
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.